Mississippi, session 2026, SB3071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum of money, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the Gulf Coast Restoration Fund, as created in Section 57-119-1 Mississippi Code of 1972, not otherwise appropriated to the Mississippi Development Authority.  These funds are provided for projects as outlined in Section 57-119-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, for assistance to local units of government, nongovernmental organizations, institutions of higher learning, community colleges, ports, airports, public-private partnerships, private for-profit entities, private nonprofit entities and local economic development entities for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........... $ 0.00. SECTION 2. The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Gulf Coast Restoration Fund not otherwise appropriated for the Mississippi Development Authority for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Gulf Coast Restoration Fund, as authorized in Senate Bill No. 2047, 2025 First Extraordinary Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........................................ ....................................... $ 30,898,945.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. Of the funds reappropriated in this section the following sums are provided for projects: (a)  To assist the City of Diamondhead with a Commercial District Transformation Project ........ $ 1,479,246.00 (b)  To assist the City of Moss Point with the Moss Point-Point of Connection Road ........... $   200,000.00 (c)  To assist the City of Long Beach with the Long Beach Harbor Complex Restoration ......... $ 3,500,000.00 (d)  To assist the Pascagoula Redevelopment Authority with the Live, Work, Play Pascagoula Riverfront Redevelopment ......................... $ 1,500,000.00 (e)  To assist the Pearl River County Board of Supervisors with the Pearl River County Industrial Park Infrastructure and Site Development .......... $ 1,091,552.00 (f)  To assist the Hancock County Port and Harbor Commission with the Technology Park and Site Development at Stennis Airport Phase .............. $ 1,633,756.00 (g)  To assist Mississippi State University Research and Technology Corporation with Continued Development of the Mississippi Cyber Center Project ......................................... $ 912,165.00 (h)  To assist the City of Gulfport with the Daniel Boulevard Extension and Connector Road between Highway 49 and Canal Road ................. $ 4,600,000.00 (i)  To assist the City of Lucedale with the Lucedale Municipal Park Stage ................. $   191,769.00 (j)  To assist the City of Moss Point with the Highway 63/Escatawpa Natural Gas Pipeline Installation ..................................... $ 1,750,000.00 (k)  To assist the Moss Point Redevelopment Authority with the Moss Point Downtown Revitalization ................................... $ 930,500.00 (l)  To assist the George County Board of Supervisors with a Grain Elevator/River Road Rehabilitation ................................... $ 27,019.00 (m)  To assist the Jackson County Economic Development Foundation with the Sunplex Light Industrial Park Site Improvements and Trent Lott Airport ......................................... $ 2,000,000.00 (n)  To assist the Pearl River County Board of Supervisors with the Pearl River County Technology Park Phase I and Site Development ...... $ 1,581,664.00 (o)  To assist the City of Bay St. Louis with a Downtown ADA Boardwalk .................... $ 1,357,438.00 (p)  To assist  the City of Ocean Springs with Mary C. O'Keefe Cultural Arts Center Renovations and Signage .......................... $ 700,000.00 (q)  To assist the Gulf Hills Resort with the Development of 2,000 feet of Blueway Waterfront with Public Marina Access ........................ $ 156,032.00 (r)  To assist the Ohr-O'Keefe Museum of Arts with Completion of the Ohr-O'Keefe Museum Campus........................................... $ 204,002.00 (s)  To assist the University of Southern Mississippi with the USM Visualization and Digital Multimedia Center of Excellence ........... $ 1,483,802.00 (t)  To assist Pinchers Seafood with a Working Waterfront ............................... $ 3,600,000.00 (u)  To assist the City of Ocean Springs with Public Works Redevelopment and Relocation ......... $ 2,000,000.00 SECTION 3.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Gulf Coast Restoration Fund not otherwise appropriated for the Mississippi Development Authority for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Gulf Coast Restoration Fund, as authorized in Senate Bill No. 2047, 2025 First Extraordinary Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........................................ ............................................... $ 23,552,981.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. Of the funds reappropriated in this section the following sums are provided for projects: (a)  To assist the Gulfport Redevelopment Commission for the completion of the second and final phase of a mixed-use, downtown redevelopment project, including public use components, so as to leverage public and private investment ......... $ 8,000,000.00 (b)  To assist the City of Pass Christian with the Water Front Redevelopment Plan ........... $ 2,375,293.00 (c)  To assist the Pascagoula Redevelopment Authority with the City of Pascagoula Rail Line Development Plan ................................. $ 617,058.00 (d)  To assist the City of Biloxi with the Popp's Ferry Extension Project ................... $ 2,039,952.00 (e)  To assist the City of Waveland with the Waveland Marina Phase I ...................... $ 2,000,000.00 (f)  To assist the Ocean Springs Redevelopment Authority or the City of Ocean Springs with Projects ............................ $ 2,000,000.00 (g)  To assist the City of Moss Point with Moss Point's Magnificent Mile 2.0 ................. $ 2,000,000.00 (h)  To assist the City of Long Beach with the Long Beach Harbor Complex Restoration ......... $ 1,000,000.00 (i)  To assist the Ocean Springs Collective with Ocean Springs Collective Projects ............ $    20,678.00 (j)  To assist the Mississippi Export Railroad with Mississippi Export Projects ......... $ 3,500,000.00 SECTION 4.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Gulf Coast Restoration Fund not otherwise appropriated for the Mississippi Development Authority for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Gulf Coast Restoration Fund, as authorized in Senate Bill No. 2047, 2025 First Extraordinary Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........................................ ............................................... $ 24,656,979.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. Of the funds reappropriated in this section the following sums are provided for projects: (a)  To assist the Mississippi State University Research and Technology Corporation with the design and construction of the Mississippi Cyber Center ........................ $ 10,678,017.00 (b)  To assist the University of Southern Mississippi Ocean Enterprise .................... $ 3,406,543.00 (c)  To assist the Stone County Board of Supervisors with the Piney Wood Pellet Mill road, rail and bypass ........................... $ 2,420,723.00 (d)  To assist the Gulfport Redevelopment Commission for Phase I of a planned 3-phase project of downtown redevelopment to be used on a public use project so as to leverage public and private investment .......................... $ 2,500,000.00 (e)  To assist the Pascagoula Redevelopment with downtown revitalization project ............. $  1,879,495.00 (f)  To assist the City of Gulfport with flood control and/or drainage for the Forest Heights Project .......................... $ 1,092,110.00 (g)  To assist the City of Moss Point with the Interstate 10 Frontage Roads, North and South .......................................... $ 1,752,394.00 (h)  To assist Pearl River Community College PRCC Aviation Aerospace Academy ................. $ 42,232.00 (i)  To assist the City of Bay St. Louis with the Court Street Parking facility, expansion and improvements ................................ $ 13,208.00 (j)  To assist the Walter Anderson Museum with Phase 3 and Phase 4 ........................ $ 565,650.00 (k)  To assist the City of Lucedale with Ventura Drive Improvements ...................... $ 306,607.00 SECTION 5.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Gulf Coast Restoration Fund not otherwise appropriated for the Mississippi Development Authority for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Gulf Coast Restoration Fund, as authorized in Senate Bill No. 2047, 2025 First Extraordinary Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........................................ ............................................... $ 13,300,072.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. Of the funds reappropriated in this section, the following sums are provided for projects recommended by the department and projects that meet the criteria outlined in Section 57-119-9, Mississippi Code of 1972: (a)  To assist the University of Southern Mississippi with the Ocean Enterprise Phase I .... $  1,444,556.00 (b)  To assist the Walter Anderson Museum Creative Complex Phase I and begin Phase II ...... $    366,299.00 Of the funds reappropriated in this section, the following sums are provided for projects that meet the criteria outlined in Section 57-119-9, Mississippi Code of 1972: (a)  To assist the Port of Pascagoula with the North Rail Connector ........................ $ 6,600,000.00 (b)  To assist the Pascagoula Redevelopment Authority with the Innovation Center ............. $  1,000,000.00 (c)  To assist the Institute for Marine Mammal Studies with Educational Classrooms and Dorms .......................................... $ 2,990,575.00 (d)  To assist the City of Long Beach with development and revitalization .............. $    410,731.00 (e)  To assist the City of Long Beach with the Quarles House .......................... $ 386,969.00 (f)  To assist George County with the Mississippi Export Railroad for the Enviva Project ........................................ $ 100,942.00 SECTION 6.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Gulf Coast Restoration Fund not otherwise appropriated for the Mississippi Development Authority for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Gulf Coast Restoration Fund, as authorized in Senate Bill No. 2047, 2025 First Extraordinary Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........................................ ............................................... $ 3,000,000.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. Of the funds reappropriated in this section the following sums are provided for the following programs: (a)  For the Mississippi Development Authority and the Air Service Development Incentive Program ........................................ $ 2,000,000.00 (b)  For the Mississippi Development Authority and the Quality of Place Incentives Program ........................................ $ 1,000,000.00 SECTION 7.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 8.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed from and after June 30, 2026.